da: Kompatibel dækanvendelse: ATV / UTV; Cykel; Industri / OTR; Varevogn / SUV; Mellemstor / tung lastbil; Motorcykel; Personbil; Traktor / landbrug; Trailer; Andet
sl-SI: Združljiva uporaba pnevmatik: ATV / UTV; Kolo; Industrija / OTR; Lahko tovorno vozilo / SUV; Srednje / težko tovorno vozilo; Motorno kolo; Osebni avtomobil; Traktor / kmetijsko vozilo; Prikolica; Drugo
en: Compatible tire application: ATV / UTV; Bicycle; Industrial / OTR; Light truck / SUV; Medium / heavy truck; Motorcycle; Passenger car; Tractor / agricultural; Trailer; Other
nb: Kompatibel dekkapp: ATV / UTV; Sykkel; Industriell / OTR; Lett lastebil / SUV; Middels / tung lastebil; Motorsykkel; Personbil; Traktor / landbruk; Tilhenger; Annet
zh-TW: 相容的輪胎用途: ATV/UTV; 自行車; 工業用/越野用 (OTR); 輕型卡車/休旅車 (SUV); 中/重型卡車; 摩托車; 轎車; 拖拉機/農用; 拖車; 其他
el: Συμβατή εφαρμογή ελαστικών: ATV / UTV; Ποδήλατο; Βιομηχανικά / OTR; Ελαφρύ φορτηγό / SUV; Μεσαίο / βαρύ φορτηγό; Μοτοσικλέτα; Επιβατικό αυτοκίνητο; Τρακτέρ / γεωργικά; Ρυμουλκούμενο; Άλλο
vi: Ứng dụng lốp tương thích: ATV / UTV; Xe đạp; Công nghiệp / OTR; Xe tải nhẹ / SUV; Xe tải trung bình / hạng nặng; Xe máy; Xe du lịch; Máy kéo / Nông nghiệp; Rơ moóc; Khác
pt-PT: Aplicação de pneus compatível: ATV/UTV; Bicicleta; Industrial/OTR; Camião ligeiro/SUV; Camião médio/pesado; Motociclo; Veículo de passageiros; Trator/agrícola; Reboque; Outra
lt-LT: Suderinamas padangų pritaikymas: Keturračiai / UTV; Dviratis; Pramoninės / OTR padangos; Lengvieji sunkvežimiai / SUV; Vidutiniai / sunkieji sunkvežimiai; Motociklas; Lengvasis automobilis; Traktoriai / žemės ūkio technika; Priekaba; Kita
zh-CN: 支持的轮胎应用: ATV / UTV; 自行车; 工业用 / OTR; 轻型卡车 / SUV; 中型 / 重型卡车; 摩托车; 乘用车; 拖拉机 / 农业用; 拖车; 其他
sv: Kompatibla däck: ATV/UTV; Cykel; Industri/OTR; Lätt lastbil/SUV; Medeltung/tung lastbil; Motorcykel; Personbil; Traktor/jordbruk; Släpvagn; Övrigt
de: Kompatibler Reifeneinsatzbereich: ATV / UTV; Fahrrad; Industrie / OTR; Leicht-LKW / SUV; Mittelschwerer / schwerer LKW; Motorrad; PKW; Traktor / Landwirtschaft; Anhänger; Sonstige
ro-RO: Aplicații compatibile pentru anvelope: ATV / UTV; Bicicletă; Industrial / OTR; Camionetă / SUV; Camion mediu / greu; Motocicletă; Autoturism; Tractor / agricol; Remorcă; Altele
it: App compatibile con pneumatici: ATV/UTV; Bicicletta; Industriale/OTR; Furgone/SUV; Camion medio/pesante; Motocicletta; Autovettura; Trattore/agricolo; Rimorchio; Altro
nl: Compatibele bandtoepassing: ATV/UTV; Fiets; Industrieel / OTR; Lichte vrachtwagen/SUV; Middelzware/zware vrachtwagen; Motorfiets; Personenauto; Tractor/landbouw; Aanhangwagen; Overige
th: การใช้งานล้อรถที่เข้ากันได้: ATV / UTV; จักรยาน; อุตสาหกรรม / นอกถนน (OTR); รถกระบะ / SUV; รถบรรทุกขนาดกลาง / ขนาดใหญ่; รถจักรยานยนต์; รถยนต์นั่ง; รถแทรกเตอร์ / รถเกษตรกรรม; รถพ่วง; อื่นๆ
ja: 互換性のあるタイヤ適用: ATV / UTV; 自転車; 産業用 / OTR; ライトトラック / SUV; 中型 / 大型トラック; オートバイ; 乗用車; トラクター / 農業用; トレーラー; その他
hu: Kompatibilis gumiabroncs: ATV / UTV; Kerékpár; Ipari / OTR; Kisteherautó / SUV; Közepes / nehéz teherautó; Motorkerékpár; Személygépkocsi; Traktor / mezőgazdasági gép; Utánfutó; Egyéb
sk-SK: Použitie kompatibilných pneumatík: ATV / UTV; Bicykel; Priemyselné / OTR; Ľahké úžitkové vozidlo / SUV; Stredné / ťažké nákladné vozidlo; Motocykel; Osobné auto; Traktor / poľnohospodárske vozidlo; Príves; Iné
ru: Совместимое применение шин: Квадроциклы (ATV/UTV); Велосипед; Промышленные / крупногабаритные (OTR); Легкие грузовики / внедорожники; Средние / тяжелые грузовики; Мотоцикл; Легковой автомобиль; Трактор / сельскохозяйственная техника; Прицеп; Другое
bg-BG: Съвместимо приложение на гумите: ATV / UTV; Велосипед; Индустриално / OTR; Лекотоварен автомобил / SUV; Среден / тежкотоварен камион; Мотоциклет; Лек автомобил; Трактор / селскостопанско; Ремарке; Друго
hr-HR: Kompatibilna primjena guma: ATV / UTV; Bicikl; Industrijska / OTR; Laki kamion / SUV; Srednji / teški kamion; Motocikl; Osobno vozilo; Traktor / poljoprivredno vozilo; Prikolica; Ostalo
pl: Kompatybilne zastosowanie opony: ATV / UTV; Rower; Przemysłowe / OTR; Lekki samochód ciężarowy / SUV; Średnia / ciężka ciężarówka; Motocykl; Samochód osobowy; Traktor / rolnicze; Przyczepa; Inne
cs: Kompatibilní způsob využití pneumatiky: ATV / UTV; Jízdní kolo; Průmyslové/OTR; Lehké nákladní vozy / SUV; Střední / těžké nákladní vozy; Motocykl; Osobní automobil; Traktor / zemědělská technika; Přívěs; Jiné
pt-BR: Aplicação de pneu compatível: ATV / UTV; Bicicleta; Industrial / OTR; Caminhão leve / SUV; Caminhão médio / pesado; Motocicleta; Carro de passeio; Trator / Agrícola; Reboque; Outro
ko: 호환 타이어 앱: ATV/UTV; 자전거; 산업용/OTR; 소형 트럭/SUV; 중대형 트럭; 모터사이클; 승용차; 트랙터/농업용; 트레일러; 기타
fr: Usage de pneu compatible: Quad / SSV; Vélo; Industriel / génie civil; Camionnette / SUV; Camion moyen / lourd; Moto; Voiture de tourisme; Tracteur / agricole; Remorque; Autre
es: Aplicación de neumáticos compatible: ATV / UTV; Bicicleta; Industrial / OTR; Camioneta / SUV; Camión mediano / pesado; Motocicleta; Automóvil de pasajeros; Tractor / agrícola; Remolque; Otro
tr: Uyumlu lastik uygulaması: ATV / UTV; Bisiklet; Endüstriyel / OTR; Hafif kamyon / SUV; Orta / ağır kamyon; Motosiklet; Binek araç; Traktör / tarım aracı; Römork; Diğer
fi: Yhteensopivat renkaat: Mönkijä / UTV; Polkupyörä; Teollisuus / OTR; Kevyt kuorma-auto / katumaasturi; Keskiraskas / raskas kuorma-auto; Moottoripyörä; Henkilöauto; Traktori / maatalous; Perävaunu; Muu